Washington statutes.
RCW 43.132.060

Legislative action upon or validity of measures not affected.

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent either house of the legislature from acting on any bill or resolution before it as otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law, and by the rules of the senate and house of representatives, nor shall the lack of any fiscal note as provided in this chapter or any error in the accuracy thereof affect the validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not alter the responsibilities of RCW 43.135.060.

[ 2000 c 182 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 19 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2000 c 182: See note following RCW 43.132.020.